Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,147
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-15,147 to 81-15,157 shall be known and may be cited
as the Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Assistance Act.

Laws 1988, LB 766, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 311, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB383, § 5;

Laws 2014, LB514, § 1.